Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.040

Inventory list—Compilation of purchase orders.

(1) A person conducting a going out of business sale shall, before recording the notice, make either an inventory list of the merchandise to be sold or a compilation of purchase orders issued by the business in the thirty days before recording the notice of the sale.

(2) If a person elects to make an inventory list:

(a) The inventory list must identify the merchandise and include the quantity of each item and the price at which each item was offered for sale within one week of recording the notice;

(b) The inventory list must identify items ordered within thirty days of recording the notice but not yet received by the business;

(c) The inventory list must be permanently attached to an affidavit executed by the person recording the notice of the sale stating that the inventory list is a true and correct inventory of merchandise owned by the business conducting the sale as of the date the affidavit is executed; and

(d) No item may be offered for sale at a going out of business sale unless the item is included in the inventory list for the sale.

(3) If a person elects to make a purchase order compilation, the compilation must be permanently attached to an affidavit executed by the person recording the notice of the sale stating that the compilation is a true and correct compilation of the purchase orders issued by the business in the thirty days before recording the notice of the sale.

(4) The affidavit must be signed under oath and acknowledged before a notary public. Each page of the inventory list or purchase order compilation must be marked in some form by a notary public to verify its identity as part of the inventory list or purchase order compilation for the going out of business sale.

(5) A person conducting a going out of business sale shall maintain possession of the affidavit and attached inventory list or purchase order compilation for three years after the ending date of the sale. The inventory list or purchase order compilation is admissible evidence of compliance or noncompliance with this chapter.

[ 1993 c 456 s 6.]